external/hyphenation-patterns/de/hyph-de-1901.pat.txt
us2sez
u3s2sig
uss3k
ussma4
us2sof
us4stü
us2sum
u2stab
u3stal
u3stat
us2ten
us2ter
ust3erl
us2th
ust2in
u3stis
u2s1tor
u2s3trä
u4strit
u2s1tur
u1su
u2sumd
u2sumg
u2sumz
us2ur
3usus
2uß
u2ß1u
2u1t
u3ta.
u3taf
u2t1alt
ut1a2m
ut2ans
u2t1ap
u2t1ar
u2taut
u2t1är
u3te.
u4t1ed
ut1ei.
ut1eie
ut1ein
ute2l
ut1ela
u2temp
ute2n1
u3ten.
uten2a
u2tent
ute3ras
ute5r4er
u3t2es
u3t2et
u2t2ev
u2t1ex
utfi4
ut3hel
u2t3hi
u2t3ho
u2thu
u2thy
u2tid
utli4n
utmas2
utma5sse
u3to.
uto4ber
uto3c
u5to3m
uto1p
u2tops
utor2a
u2tord
u2töl
4utr
ut3rea
u2trou
ut3rü
ut3sau
ut2säu
ut4schl
ut4schm
ut4scho
ut4schö
ut3se
ut3s2k
ut1so
ut1s2p
ut2s3pa
ut3tan
ut3t4l
utt1s2
utu2b
u2tum
utu4n
u2t1une
utu4re
utu3ru
utz3eng
utz2er
ut2z1in
ut2z1w
2u1u4
uum1
uuma4
uungsmas8
u1ü4
u1v4
u2ve.
uve3rä
u1w
2u1x
ux2e
ux2o
uxt2
u1ya
2u1z
uzo2f
uz3ot
uz1we
uz3z2
uzz4l
1üb
üb1ä
2übc
2übd
üb4e2
übe3le
übe4na
übe3ne
über3
ü4bet
üb3l
üb3r
2üc
ü1che
üch3l
üch4s1c
ücht4e
ücke4n
ück1er
ück3eri
ücker6ke
ück4spe
ü4d3a4
üde2i
üde2l
üden2g
ü3d2ens
üd3o4
üdö4
üd3r
üd3s2
üdsa1
üd3t6
üdu2
üdwe4
üe2
üeb3
ü4f1a
ü2f1ä
ü2f1ei
ü2fent
üfer2
ü2f1erg
üf2fl
ü2f1i
üf3l
ü2fo
üf3te
üf4tei
ü1g
üg2e
üge2l1a2
üge6lei6s
üge2lo
ü2g3l
ü2gn
üg3s
ügungsma8
üh3a4
ü1he
ü2h1ei
ü2h1eng
ü2h1ent
üh1er
ü2herf
ü2her2k
ü2her2z
ü2hex
üh1i2
üh1lä
ühl2er
ühmen4s
üh3mo
üh3ne
üh1o2
üh3r2e
ühr3ei.
üh1ro
ühr3ta
ühs2
üh3sp
üh3stu
üh3t2
üh4th
üht4r
ü1hu
üh1w
ü1k2
ül1a
ül2c
ü3l2e
ü4l3ef
üle2ra
ül2la4
üll1ad
üll1au
ül2lei
üll2er
ül4leu
ül2lid
ül2li2n
ül2lo
ül2lö
ülls2
ü2lö
ü1lu
ü2ma
ü2ment
üme2ra
ü2m1id
ü2m1in
ü2m1u
2ün
ü4n1a
ün2da
ün2dr
ünf1
ünf5li
ün2g3l
üngs2
ün2za
ünzu2
ün2zun
ün2zw
ü1pe
üpf3l
ü1pi
üp2p3l
ür1a
üre2
ü2r1ei
ü2r1el
ür2fl
ür2fr
ür4g3en4g
ürk2e
ü1r2o3
ürom2
üror2
ür4ster
ürt4h
ür2zö
ür2zw
üs2a
ü2schl
üse3h
üse3l
üse4n
ü1sp
üs2s1c
üss2e
ü4s3sel
üs2so
üs4st
üs2su
üs4t
ü2sta
üste2n1
ü2str
ü1su
ü1ß
2üt
ü1ta
ü2t1al
ü1te
üte4n
ütent4
üten3z2
üte2ra
üte2re
üterich6
ü1ti
üt3r
üt2s1
ütte4n
üt2tr
ü1tu
üt3z2e
üt2zw
ü1v
ü1z
3va.
2v1ab
va1c
va1f4
va3g
vag2a
va4gh
va2la
val2s
2vanb
2vang
2varb
vas2
v4at
va2t1a2
va2tei
va4teng
vates2
va2t3h
va4tid
vatik2
va4tim
va4t1in
vati8ons.
va2t3r
vat3s2
va2t1u
vat3z
2v1au
vä1
2v1b
2v1c
2v1d2
1ve2
ve3ar
veau3s
ve3b4
ve3c
ve3d
ve3g
ve3h2
ve4i
2v1ein
veit2
veits1
ve3la
2velan
ve4l1au
2v1ele
ve3lei
ve3li
ve3lo
ve3ma
2ve3mu
ve3nal
ve4nas
ven2c
ve3ne
venen4d
vener4s
ve3ni
ve4nin
ve3nö
ven4t3ag
ve3nü
ve3of
ver1
ver3a
ve3rad
ve3rand
ver4ane
vera4s
ver3b2l
ver3d2
vere2
verf4
ver3g4
vergas6
verga7sse
ve3ri
ve4rin
ver3k
vermas8sen
vern2
ver3sta
vert4
ver5te
ver3u4
ve3s
2vesc
2vese
ve4sh
ve4s1p
ves4t
ve3ta
vete1
vete3r
ve3ti
ve3tr
2veü
ve3v
ve3w
ve3x
2v1f4
2v1g
2v1h
vi1an
vi3ar
vi4a3t
vi3de
vie2h3a
vi2el
vi3en
vie4rec
vie2w1
vig2
2vii
vi2l1a
vi2lä
vi4l1e2h
vi2lei
vi2l1in
vil3l
2v1i2m
vima2
vi4na
2v1in3d
ving3
vin2s
2v1int
vi3sa
vise4
vi3s2i
vi3s2o
vi2sp
vis2u
viv2
vi3z
vize3
2v1k
2v1l2
v3le3
2v1m
vm2e
2v1n2
2v1ob
vo2be
vob4l
vo3ga
voge2l1
vo2gu
vol2a
voll3ar
voll7auf.
vollen6
voll5end
2v1op
vo2r1
vor3a
voran8schl
vore4
vor3ec
vor3g
vo3ri
vo5rig
vorm2
vormen4
vor3o
vorö4
vort4
vot2a
voy1
2v1p
vr2
v1ra
v2ree
3v2ri
v1ro
2v1s2
v3sz
2v1t
vue3
vu2enu
vu2et
2vumf
2vumg
2vumk
2v1ü
2v1v
2v1w
2v1z
w2a
1waa
wab2bl
wa3che
wach6stu
wach4t4r
waffe2
waffel3
1wag
wa5ge
wage4n
wa2g3n
wa3go
1wah
wahl5ent
wah4ler
wah2li
1wal
wala3c
2walb
wal4da
wa2les
wal4li4n
wal2m1
wals2
walt3a
wal6terl
wal2to
walt4st
wa3na
wan2d1a2
wan2dr
w3anf
wan3g2e
wang4s
1wann
wan6z5en6d
wa2p
1war2e
ware1i
wa3ren
wart4e
1was
wa3sa
wa4scha
wa3sche
wa3schi
wasch3l
wa3sh
wass4e
1wäh
1wäl
wäm3
2wäng
1wäs3
wä5sc
wä3sche
wä4ss
2w1äu3
2w1b2
wbu2
2w1c
2w1d
we2a
we2b1a
we2b3l
we2bo
we2br
we2e2
weed3
we2fl
1weg
we2g1a
weg5ersc
we4g3l
we4gn
we2g1o2
we2g3r
weg1s
wegs2a
1weh
weh4rer
wei2bl
wei3dr
2weie
weifel6d
wei3k4
1weil
wei3nel
wein4s3a
weinsau6
wei3sc
weis4s3p
wei2t3r
weit1s
wei5ze
welle4
wel6schl
wel6schr
wel2t1
welt3a2
welte4
wel6t5en6d
wel4th
welt3i
welt3r
wem2ma2
wen3a2
wen2gl
we3n4i
wen2ka
wen4kla
wen4k3ri
we2r3a2
wer2bl
werb2s
1werbu
werd2
5werdens
1werdu
werer2
wer2fl
2werg
wer4g3el
wer2g3o
wer2gr
werin2
we4r1io
1werk.
wer2ka
1werke
wer2ki
wer2kl
wer2kn
wer2ko
wer2ku
we2rö
wer4sta
wer2ta
wer3t3ei
wer6teig
werter6k
wer6t5erm
wer2th
wer2t1o2
wer4tre
wer4t3ri
wer4tum
1we3s2e
wesen4s3
we2sp
wes2t
we4st1a
we4stec
we4st3ei
we5sten.
we6sten6d
we5stens
we4steu
we4st1i
we4st1o4
we2stö
we2st3r
we4stu
1wet
2wets
wett3s
2w1ey
2w1g
whi2
w3ho
w2i
1wid
wi2e
2wieb
wie3l2
wie3n2e
wie4st
wik2
1wil
wim2ma
wim4m3u
win2a
win4d3ec
win2dr
win2e
2wing
win2kl
win8n7er8sc
win2no
win4num
win3s
wint2
1wi4r
wire3
wi5s2e
wi2sp
1wiss
wi3st
wi3th
1witzl
wiz2
2w1k
2w1l
2w1m
2wn
wns2a
wn3sh
1wo1c
wo2cha
woche4
1woh
woh4lei
1wolf
wolf2s
wol4la
wol2lä
wol4ler
wor3a
wor3d
wo2r3i
wort1a
wor6terh
wor2t3r
wo4r3u
wor3ü
wot2
1wöc
wöl2fo
wört4h
2w1p
w2r
w3ro
2w1s
ws2e
w3s2h
w3s2k
2w1t
wti2
1wuc
wuch4sc
wuch4st
wuls2
wul3se
wund4e
wung3r
wun2s
4wur.
wur2fa
wur2fr
wurs4
1wurst
wus4
1wu2t1
1wüh
wüs4
2w1w
2w1z
x1a
1xa.
2xa2b
1x2ad
1xae
xa1fl
1x2a3g2
2xal
xal2l
xa2m
xand4
x2an3t2
x2anz
1x2as
xau3
xaus2
2x1b4
2xc
x1ce
x1ch
x1cl
4x1d
1xe
2x1e4g
2xek
xe2l
x1ele
x1em
3x2em.
x2ems
x2en
xen3s2
x2er.
x2ere
xers2
2x1eu
2x1ex
4x1f
2x1g
2x1h
xib4
xi1c
xich2
2xid
xi2dan
xide2
xi2dei
xi2d3em
x1i2do
xi4ds
x2ie
xie3l
xi3g
3xik
xi2ler
xi2lo
xi2l1u
xin3s2
x2is
xi2sa
xi2s1e
xi2s1o2
xi2sp
xis5s2
xi2su
xi3te
x1i2tu
2x1j
2x1k2
xkal2
4x2l2
x3lä
x3le
2x1m
2x1n
2xod
2x3oe4
x1or
2x1ö2
4x1p
xpor6ter
x1q
2x1r
4x3s2
4x1t
xt1a
x3ta.
x3tan
xt2ant
x3t2as
x2t1ä
x3tät
x2t1e2d
xt1ein
x2t1el
x2tent
x2t1er2f
x2t1ev
xtfi4
x2t3h
x2tid
xti2la
x2t1il2l
xt1o2
x2tor
xtra3b4
x2t3ran
xt3rec
xt3s2
x2t1um
x2t1un
1xu
xu1a
2x1u2n
xu2s3
xuss2
2xv
2x1w
2xy
3xy.
3xys
2x1z
2yab
1yac
y2ach
y2ag
ya1h
y1al.
y1a2m
y2ana
yan2g
y1ank
y2a3ra
ya2s
yat2
y1ät
y1b
y1c
y2chi
y3chis
ych3n
y1d4
y3dr
y1e
y2ec
ye2d
y2ef
y2el
yen4n
y2ere
yer2n1
y2es
yes2p
y3e4st
ye2th
y1f2
y1g
ygi2
ygie5
yg2l
y1h
y3ho
yhr2
y1i4
y1j
y1k2
yke3n
yk3s
y1l
y2l1a2m
yla2n
y3lant
yl4ante
y4lantr
y3lat
ylau2
yl3c
yle2
y4le.
yl1em
y2l1es
yli4n
yl2lo2
yl2lö2
yloni1
ym4a
yma2t
ym4e
ymp2
ym2pha
ympi1e
yn2eu
yn3k2
y2n1o
yno4d
yob2
yom2
yon4i
y1ont
y1os
y1ou
y1p
ypa2
yp1ab3
yp3an
yp2e2
yper3
y2pf
y2p1i2d
y2p1in
y2p3l
ypo3
y4p3s
yp3t
ypu2
y2p1um
y1q
y1r
yra3k
y3r2e
y3ri
yri1e
y3ro
yrr2
y1s
ys2an
y3s2c
y3s2e1
y3s2h
y4s3l
ysme3
ys2o
ys2pa
ys2pi
yst2e
yst4h
y3s2ty
ysu2
y3s2z
y1t2
y2te.
y2tes
yt4h
ythe1
y3to
yt3t
y1u2r
y1v
y1w
y1y
y1z2
yze3r
za2
2z1ab
zab3l
za3cha
za3chä
2z1ad
2z1af
za3ge
za3gr
3z2ah
zah4ner4
2z3ak
za3ka
4z5akk
2za3l
3zali
2z1am
z1an
za4na
za3ne
2z3anf
2z3angs
3z2ank
zan2ka
z3anl
3z2a3no
2z3anr
zanti1
z1ar
3zar.
za3ra
2zarb
za3re
za3ri
2zarm
3z2a3ro
zar2tr
2z1as
zast4
2z1aß
z3at
za3t2e
3zaub
z1au2f
2z3aug
3zaun
2z1aut
2z1äc
3z2äh
2z1äm
z1än
z1ärg
z1ärm
2z1äus
2zäuß
4z3b4
zbü1b
zbübe3
2z3c
2z3d2
zdan2
zdä1
zeau3
zeaus4
2z1e2ben
2z1echo
ze1e2
2z1eff
zehe4
zehen1
zeh2l
ze3ho
z2ei1f4
zeil2
zei3la
zeile4
2z1ein
ze1in.
zeinbus6
z2e1ind
zei4ne
ze3inse
zei3s2
zeist4
zei2ta
zei4t3er
zei2tr
zeit3ri
ze2l1a2
zelau2
ze2l1ä
2ze2lek
2zelem
ze2len
ze2l1er
ze2l1in
zel3la
zel2lä
zel4leh
zel6lein
zel6ler6t
zelli4n
zelm4
ze2l1o
zels2
zel3sz
zelt4h
zelu2
2z1emp
5zen.
ze4n1ac
ze4nas
ze3n2em
4zenge.
z4engl
2zengp
zen3n
ze2no
4zensem
zens2p
z2entn
zent3s
2zentw
2zentz
ze2nu
zen4z3er
zen2zw
zeo4r
3z2er.
ze2rad
ze1ral
ze2re2b
z2erfe
2z1ergä
4z3ergeb
z4ergl
z2erhe
4z3erhö
zerin6te
zerk2
z2erko
3zerl.
zer4lau
4zerleb
2zerlö
3z2ern
zer4nan
zer4n3e4b
zer4nei
2z1erö
2z1erq
3zers
4z1er2sa
4z3erste
zerta2
zer4t3ag
zert4an
zer6terl
zer4tin
zer2to
zer6t5rau
z1erw
2zerwe
2z1erz
3zerza
zer2ze
z3erzi
ze2s
zes2c
zes1e
zes3er
ze4s3p
zes2s1c
zes4sei
zessen4
zes6s5end
zes4ser
zes2sp
ze3sta
zes2th
ze2ß1
2zeta
ze2tr
2zetts
zeu2g3r
2z1e2x1
2z1f4
zfäs3
2z3g4
zgang5
zger2a
zger2s1
2z1h2
z2hen
zhir3
3zi.
zial5l
zi3alo
zich2o
zi2dei
zid3r
zie2l1i
zi1erh
zi1es
3z2ig
zig2e
3zil
zil2e
z2imm
2zimp
zim2t3
2z1ind
zin2e
zin3ei
2z1inf
z1inh
zin3it
zin2kn
zin2na
zin4o
zin2sa
zin4ser
4zinsuf
z1inv
zi2o3
zirk2
zirk6s
2zirr
2z1i2so
zis4t
zistras6
zi3s2z
zi2tan
zite4
zi2t1o4
ziv2
2z1j
4z1k4
2z1l2
2z1m2
zmas6sen
2z3n2
z3oas
2z1ob
z1of
zo2gl
2z1oh
zolla2
zol3le
zol6ler6t
zol2li2
zon3s4
zon4t3er
zo2o
2zope
2z1o2r
zo3re
3zorn
zor4ne
2z1osz
2zö2f
2z1ök
z1öl
zö4le
3z2öll
2zöls
2zön
2z3p4
2z1q
2z3r2
4z1s2
z3sa
zsau2
z3sh
z3sk
zspor2
z3str
z3sz
2z1t
zta2n
zt3ane
z2t1au
ztein3
zt3eins
zt2el
z2t1ent
z3tes
zte3str
zt3h
zt4hem
z3t4her
zt3rec
zt3s
zu3a
zu1ä2
zub4
3zuc
zud4
zudi4
zu2el
zu3f4
zu2gar
zu4gent
zu3gl
zu4gla
zu4glö
zug4ste
zug4stu
zug1un
2z1uhr
zu3h2u
zu1i2
zu3k
zul2
2z1um.
zumen2
2zumf
2zumg
zum2i
2zuml
2zumr
2z1ums
2zunab
zun2e
4zunget
2z1ungl
z1uni
2zu2nio
2zuniv
2zunr
2z1uns
2zunt
zup2fi
zu3pl
zu3r4a
2z1urk
2z1url
2z1urs
2z1urt
zu3ru
zu5s2
zusch4
zu3t2
zut4r
zut4u
zut3z
zuz2
2zü4b
3züc
zür1c
2z1v
zw2
z1wac
zwan2d1
z2wang
z1war
2zwäs
2zweg
2zweh
z2weig
2zweil
zwei3s
2z1wel
2z1wen
2z1wer
2z1wes
z2wic
zwi4e
3zwing
2zwirt
z2wisc
4zwiss
z2wit
2z1wo
z1wör
z1wur
2z1wü
zy1an.
zy2le4
4z1z
z3z4a
zza3b4
zze3s
z3zi
z4z1id
zz2ö
zzug2
